District of Columbia statutes.
16-1358

Oath of jurors.

The jurors selected and impaneled, as provided by section 16-1357 , shall take an oath or affirmation, administered by the court, that they:

(1)

are not interested in any manner in the property to be condemned;

(2)

are not, to their knowledge, related to any person interested in the property; and

(3)

will, impartially and to the best of their judgment, ascertain, appraise, and award just compensation for the property to be condemned and taken in the proceeding.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 579, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Section References

This section is referenced in § 16-1359.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-1358.
1973 Ed., § 16-1358.